Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2313
Luring or enticement
of wildlife prohibited.

The luring or enticement
of wildlife into a permitted domesticated cervine animal facility for the
purpose of containing such wildlife is cause for permit suspension under section
54-2310 and shall be considered a violation of section 37-479. Any
permitholder under the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act who lures or entices
wildlife into such a facility is responsible for any and all expenses incurred
by the commission to remove such wildlife from the facility.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 12;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 38.